Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508C,


as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 297, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2025, Section 1210.508C), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.508C. A. To identify students who have a


deficiency in reading or who have characteristics of dyslexia that


lead to or cause reading difficulty, each student enrolled in


kindergarten and first, second, and third grade in a public school


in this state shall be screened at the beginning, middle, and end of


each school year for reading skills including, but not limited to,


phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, and


comprehension. A screening instrument approved by the State Board


of Education, in consultation with the Commission for Educational


Quality and Accountability and the Secretary of Education, shall be


utilized for the purposes of this section. In determining which


screening instrument to approve, the State Board of Education, the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability, and the


Secretary of Education shall take into consideration at a minimum


the following factors:


1. The time required to conduct the screening instrument with


the intention of minimizing the impact on instructional time;


2. The timeliness in reporting screening instrument results to


teachers, administrators, and parents and legal guardians of


students; and

Req. No. 2773 Page 2


3. The integration of the screening instrument into reading


curriculum.


B. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the State Board of


Education shall approve no fewer than three screening instruments


for use at the beginning, middle, and end of the school year for


monitoring of progress and for measurement of reading skills as


required in subsection A of this section. The screening instruments


shall meet the following criteria:


1. Assess for phonological awareness, decoding, fluency,


vocabulary, and comprehension;


2. Document the validity and reliability of each assessment;


3. Can be used for identifying students who are at risk for


reading deficiency and progress monitoring throughout the school


year; and


4. Can be used to assess students with disabilities and English


language learners; and


5. Accompanied by a data management system that provides


profiles of each student, class, grade level, and school building.


The profiles shall identify each student’s instructional point of


need and reading achievement level. The State Board shall also


determine other comparable reading assessments for diagnostic


purposes to be used for students at risk of reading failure.


C. 1. Exemptions to the screening requirements of this section


may be provided to students who have documented evidence that they

Req. No. 2773 Page 3


meet at least one of the following criteria as related to the


provision of classroom instruction:


a. the student participates in the Oklahoma Alternate


Assessment Program (OAAP) and is taught using


alternate methods,


b. the student’s primary expressive or receptive


communication is sign language,


c. the student’s primary form of written or read text is


Braille, or


d. the student’s primary expressive or receptive language


is not English, the student is identified as an


English learner using a state-approved identification


assessment, and the student has had less than one (1)


school year of instruction in an English-learner


program.


2. A public school that grants an exemption pursuant to


paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide ongoing evidence of


student progression toward English language acquisition with the


same frequency as administration of screening assessments. Evidence


may include, but not be limited to, student progression toward OAAP


reading essential elements, proficiency in sign language and reading


comprehension, and proficiency in Braille and reading comprehension.


D. 1. Students who are administered a screening instrument


pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found not to be

Req. No. 2773 Page 4


meeting grade-level targets shall be provided a program of reading


instruction designed to enable students to acquire the appropriate


grade-level reading skills. The program of reading instruction


shall be based on scientific reading research and align with the


subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education. A


program of reading instruction shall include:


a. sufficient additional in-school instructional time for


the acquisition of phonological awareness, decoding,


fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension,


b. if necessary and if funding is available, tutorial


instruction after regular school hours, on Saturdays,


and during summer; however, such instruction may not


be counted toward the one-hundred-eighty-day one-


hundred-eighty-one-day or one-thousand-eighty-hour


one-thousand-eighty-six-hour school year required in


Section 1-109 of this title,


c. assessments identified for diagnostic purposes and


periodic monitoring to measure the acquisition of


reading skills including, but not limited to,


phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,


and comprehension, as identified in the student’s


program of reading instruction,


d. high-quality instructional materials grounded in


scientifically based reading research, and

Req. No. 2773 Page 5


e. a means of providing every family of a student in


prekindergarten, kindergarten, and first, second, and


third grade access to free online evidence-based


literacy instruction resources to support the


student’s literacy development at home.


2. A student enrolled in kindergarten or first, second, or


third grade who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based


on the screening instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of


this section shall receive an individual reading intervention plan


no later than thirty (30) days after the identification of the


deficiency in reading. The reading intervention plan shall be


provided in addition to core reading instruction that is provided to


all students. The reading intervention plan shall:


a. describe the research-based reading intervention


services the student will receive to remedy the


deficiency in reading,


b. provide explicit and systematic instruction in


phonological awareness, decoding, fluency, vocabulary,


and comprehension, as applicable,


c. monitor the reading progress of each student’s reading


skills throughout the school year and adjust


instruction according to the student’s needs, and


d. continue until the student is determined to be meeting


grade-level targets in reading based on screening

Req. No. 2773 Page 6


instruments administered pursuant to subsection A of


this section or assessments identified for diagnostic


purposes and periodic monitoring pursuant to


subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this subsection.


3. The reading intervention plan for each student identified


with a deficiency in reading shall be developed by a Student Reading


Proficiency Team and shall include supplemental instructional


services and supports. Each team shall be composed of:


a. the parent or legal guardian of the student,


b. the teacher assigned to the student who had


responsibility for reading instruction in that


academic year,


c. a teacher who is responsible for reading instruction


and is assigned to teach in the next grade level of


the student, and


d. a certified reading specialist or an individual with


advanced training or specialization in literacy


instruction, if one is available.


4. A school district shall notify the parent or legal guardian


of any student in kindergarten or first, second, or third grade who


exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based on the screening


instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this section.


The notification shall occur no later than thirty (30) days after


the identification of the deficiency in reading.

Req. No. 2773 Page 7


E. 1. Every school district shall adopt and implement a


district strong readers plan which has had input from school


administrators, teachers, and parents and legal guardians and if


possible a reading specialist, and which shall be submitted


electronically to and approved by the State Board of Education. The


plan shall be updated annually. School districts shall not be


required to electronically submit the annual updates to the Board if


the last plan submitted to the Board was approved and expenditures


for the program include only expenses relating to individual and


small group tutoring, purchase of and training in the use of


screening and assessment measures, summer school programs, and


Saturday school programs. If any expenditure for the program is


deleted or changed or any other type of expenditure for the program


is implemented, the school district shall be required to submit the


latest annual update to the Board for approval. The district strong


readers plan shall include a plan for each site which includes an


analysis of the data provided by the Oklahoma School Testing Program


and other reading assessments utilized as required in this section,


and which outlines how each school site will comply with the


provisions of the Strong Readers Act.


2. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the


implementation and evaluation of the provisions of the Strong


Readers Act. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to,


an analysis of the data required in subsection L O of this section.

Req. No. 2773 Page 8


F. 1. Any first-grade, second-grade, or third-grade student


who demonstrates proficiency in reading through a grade-level


appropriate screening instrument approved pursuant to subsection B


of this section shall not require a program of reading instruction


or an individual reading intervention plan. After a student has


demonstrated proficiency through a screening instrument, the


district shall provide notification to the parent or legal guardian


of the student that he or she has satisfied the requirements of the


Strong Readers Act. The district shall continue to monitor the


student in the next successive grade level to ensure he or she


maintains proficiency.


2. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if a third-grade


student is identified at any point of the academic year as having a


significant reading deficiency, which shall be defined as not


meeting grade-level targets on a screening instrument administered


pursuant to subsection A of this section, the district shall provide


the student with intensive intervention services for the appropriate


amount of the instructional day consistent with the individual


reading intervention plan developed pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection D of this section and as determined by the Student


Reading Proficiency Team. The district shall also provide notice of


the significant reading deficiency to the student’s parent or legal


guardian as provided for by paragraph 4 of subsection D of this


section. Intensive intervention services shall continue until the

Req. No. 2773 Page 9


student demonstrates proficiency at his or her grade level based on


a screening instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this


section.


G. 1. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a student


enrolled in first, second, or third grade who demonstrates


proficiency in reading at the third-grade level through a screening


instrument approved pursuant to subsection B of this section shall


not be subject to retention pursuant to this section. After a


student has demonstrated proficiency through a screening instrument,


the school district shall provide notification to the parent or


legal guardian of the student that he or she has satisfied the


requirements of the Strong Readers Act.


2. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a third-grade


student who has not demonstrated proficiency in reading at the


third-grade level through a screening instrument approved pursuant


to subsection B of this section, who has not met grade-level


performance based on scores for the standards for reading


foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the


statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to Section


1210.508 of this title, and is not subject to a good-cause exemption


as provided for in subsection K of this section, shall not be


eligible for automatic promotion to fourth grade and shall be


retained in the third grade and provided intensive intervention


services as provided for in subsection F of this section. The

Req. No. 2773 Page 10


performance levels established by the Commission for Educational


Quality and Accountability pursuant to Section 1210.508 of this


title shall ensure that students meeting the performance level


criteria are performing at grade level on the reading foundations


and processes and the vocabulary portions of the statewide third-


grade assessment.


3. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a third-grade


student who has not demonstrated proficiency in reading at the


third-grade level through a screening instrument approved pursuant


to subsection B of this section, who has not met grade-level


performance based on scores for the standards for reading


foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the


statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to Section


1210.508 of this title, and is not subject to a good-cause exemption


as provided for in subsection K of this section may be evaluated for


probationary promotion by the Student Reading Proficiency Team


created pursuant to subsection D of this section. A student shall


be promoted if the team members unanimously recommend probationary


promotion to the school principal and the school district


superintendent, and they agree to approve the recommendation that


promotion is the best option for the student. If a student is


granted probationary promotion, the team shall continue to review


the reading performance of the student until he or she demonstrates


grade-level reading proficiency, as identified through a screening

Req. No. 2773 Page 11


instrument for the corresponding grade level in which the student is


enrolled.


H. Each school district shall annually report in an electronic


format to the State Department of Education, the Office of


Educational Quality and Accountability, and the Secretary of


Education the number of third-grade students retained pursuant to


this section, the number of third-grade students promoted to the


fourth grade due to a good-cause exemption as provided for in


subsection K of this section by each category of good cause, the


number of students in kindergarten through third grade per grade


level who exhibit grade-level reading proficiency, the number of


students per grade level who received intensive intervention


services pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section,


the number of students per grade level who attended a summer academy


as provided for in Section 1210.508E of this title, the number of


students per grade level who exhibited improved reading proficiency


after completion of intensive intervention services, and the number


of students per grade level who are still in need of intensive


intervention services. The State Department of Education shall


publicly report the aggregate and district-specific numbers


submitted pursuant to this subsection on its website and shall


provide electronic copies of the report to the Governor, Secretary


of Education, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Speaker of the


House of Representatives, and to the respective chairs of the

Req. No. 2773 Page 12


committees with responsibility for common education policy in each


legislative chamber.


H. I. The parent of any student who is found to have a reading


deficiency and is not meeting grade-level reading targets and has


been provided a program of reading instruction as provided for in


paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section shall be notified in


writing of the following:


1. That the student has been identified as having a substantial


deficiency in reading;


2. A description of the current services that are provided to


the student pursuant to subsection D of this section;


3. A description of the proposed intensive intervention


services and supports that will be provided to the student that are


designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency as


provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section;


4. That a student who is shall not be promoted to the fourth


grade if he or she has not demonstrated proficiency in reading at


the third-grade level through a screening instrument approved


pursuant to subsection B of this section and has not met grade-level


performance based on scores for the standards for reading


foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the


statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to Section


1210.508 of this title unless the student qualifies for a good-cause


exemption as provided for in subsection K of this section. A

Req. No. 2773 Page 13


student who is promoted due to a good-cause exemption shall receive


supplemental intensive intervention services;


5. Strategies for parents to use in helping their child succeed


in reading proficiency; and


6. The grade-level performance scores of the student.


I. J. No student may be assigned to a grade level based solely


on age or other factors that constitute social promotion.


J. K. For those students who have not demonstrated proficiency


in reading at the third-grade level through a screening instrument


approved pursuant to subsection B of this section and have not met


grade-level performance based on scores for the standards for


reading foundations and processes and the vocabulary portions of the


statewide third-grade assessment administered pursuant to Section


1210.508 of this title, a school district may promote the student


for good cause only. Good-cause exemptions for promotion shall be


limited to the following:


1. English language learners who have had fewer than two (2)


years of instruction in an English language learner program;


2. Students with disabilities whose individualized education


program (IEP), consistent with state law, indicates that the student


is to be assessed with alternate achievement standards through the


OAAP;





Req. No. 2773 Page 14


3. Students who demonstrate an acceptable level of performance


on an alternative standardized reading assessment approved by the


State Board of Education;


4. Students with disabilities who participate in the statewide


assessments administered pursuant to Section 1210.508 of this title


and who have an IEP that reflects that the students have received


intensive remediation in reading for more than two (2) years but


still demonstrate a deficiency in reading and were previously


retained in prekindergarten for academic reasons, kindergarten,


first grade, second grade, or third grade;


5. Students who have received intensive remediation in reading


through a program of reading instruction for two (2) or more years


but still demonstrate a deficiency in reading and who were


previously retained in prekindergarten for academic reasons, first


grade, second grade, or third grade for a total of two (2) years;


and


6. Students who have been granted an exemption for medical


emergencies by the State Department of Education.


L. To request a good-cause exemption provided for in subsection


K of this section, the student’s teacher shall submit documentation


to the school principal that indicates the student meets one of the


good-cause exemptions and promotion of the student is appropriate.


The principal shall review the request and make a recommendation to


the school district superintendent regarding whether the request

Req. No. 2773 Page 15


should be approved. The school district superintendent shall


approve or disapprove the request and submit the response in writing


to the school principal who submitted the recommendation.


M. 1. Each school district board of education shall annually


publish on the school website and report electronically to the State


Department of Education, the Office of Educational Quality and


Accountability, and the Secretary of Education by September 1 of


each year the following information on the prior school year:


a. the policies and procedures adopted by the school


district board of education to implement the


provisions of this section. The information submitted


shall include expenditures related to implementing the


provisions of this section, the number of staff


implementing the provisions of this section, and


average daily classroom time devoted to implementing


the provisions of this section,


b. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in


kindergarten through third grade who did not meet


grade-level targets based on a screening instrument


administered pursuant to subsection A of this section,


c. by grade, the number and percentage of all students in


kindergarten through third grade who have been


enrolled in the district for fewer than two (2) years,



Req. No. 2773 Page 16


d. by grade, the number and percentage of students in


kindergarten through third grade who demonstrated


grade-level proficiency based on a screening


instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of


this section, and


e. by grade, the number and percentage of students in


kindergarten through third grade who are on an


individualized education program (IEP) in accordance


with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act


(IDEA) and who demonstrated grade-level proficiency


based on a screening instrument administered pursuant


to subsection A of this section or an alternative


assessment prescribed by the student’s IEP.


2. The State Department of Education shall establish a uniform


format for school districts to report the information required in


this subsection. The format shall be developed with input from


school districts and shall be provided not later than ninety (90)


days prior to the annual due date. The Department shall annually


compile the information required, along with state-level summary


information, and electronically report the information to the


public, the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives.



Req. No. 2773 Page 17


K. N. The State Department of Education shall provide technical


assistance as needed to aid school districts in administering the


provisions of the Strong Readers Act.


L. O. On or before January 31 of each year, the State


Department of Education shall electronically submit to the Governor,


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and members of the committees with responsibility


over common education in both houses of the Legislature a Strong


Readers Report which shall include, but is not limited to, trend


data detailing three (3) years of data, disaggregated by student


subgroups to include economically disadvantaged, major racial or


ethnic groups, students with disabilities, and English language


learners, as appropriate for the following:


1. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in


kindergarten through third grade determined to be at risk for


reading difficulties compared to the total number of students


enrolled in each grade;


2. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in


kindergarten who continue to be at risk for reading difficulties as


determined by the year-end administration of the screening


instrument required in subsection A of this section;


3. The statewide aggregate number and percentage of students in


kindergarten through third grade who have successfully completed


their program of reading instruction and are reading on grade level

Req. No. 2773 Page 18


as determined by the results of screening instruments administered


pursuant to subsection A of this section;


4. The statewide aggregate and district-specific number and


percentage of students that meet or do not meet grade-level targets


for reading based on screening instruments administered pursuant to


subsection A of this section;


5. The amount of funds received by each district for


implementation of the Strong Readers Act;


6. An evaluation and narrative interpretation of the report


data analyzing the impact of the Strong Readers Act on students’


ability to read at grade level;


7. The type of reading instruction practices and methods


currently being used by school districts in the state;


8. Socioeconomic information, access to reading resources


outside of school, and screening for and identification of learning


disabilities for students not reading at the appropriate grade level


in kindergarten and first through third grade;


9. By grade level, the types of intensive intervention efforts


being conducted by school districts for students who are not on an


IEP and who are not reading at the appropriate grade level and for


students who are on an IEP and who are not reading at the


appropriate grade level; and


10. Any recommendations for improvements or amendments to the


Strong Readers Act.

Req. No. 2773 Page 19


The State Department of Education may contract with an


independent entity for the reporting and analysis requirements of


this subsection.


M. P. Copies of the results of the screening instruments


administered pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be made


a part of the permanent record of each student.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508D,


as amended by Section 6, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1210.508D), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.508D. A. Contingent on the provision of


appropriated funds designated for the Strong Readers Act, school


districts may be allocated monies for each enrolled kindergarten


student or first-, second-, and third-grade student of the current


school year, including any student who has been retained in the


third grade pursuant to Section 1210.508C of this title, who is


found to be in need of remediation or intensive intervention


services in reading. The allocation shall be distributed to each


school district upon approval of the strong readers plan for the


school district by the State Board of Education and the submittal of


a child-count report to the State Department of Education that


details the number of students identified as needing remediation or


intensive intervention services in reading. To determine a per-


student allocation amount, the total amount of funds available for


allocation each year shall be divided by the total number of

Req. No. 2773 Page 20


students in the state identified as in need of remediation or


intensive intervention services in reading as provided for in


Section 1210.508C of this title. Each school district shall be


allocated an amount equal to the per-student allocation amount


multiplied by the number of identified students enrolled in the


school district.


B. Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, districts


receiving more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)


pursuant to subsection A of this section shall spend no less than


ten percent (10%) to provide professional development for teachers


teaching prekindergarten through grade five. The professional


development shall include training in the science of reading


including how students learn to read; training in providing explicit


and systematic instruction in phonological awareness, decoding,


fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension; implementing reading


strategies that research has shown to be successful in improving


reading among students with reading difficulties; and instructional


materials required for implementation.


C. By June 30, 2022, the Department shall approve and publish a


list of professional development programs that are evidence-based


and directly address the cognitive science of how students learn to


read for which districts are permitted to use the funds received


under this section.



Req. No. 2773 Page 21


D. If a teacher attends and completes a professional


development institute in elementary reading approved by the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability during the


summer or when school is not in session, the teacher may receive a


stipend equal to the amount of the cost for a substitute teacher,


based on the amount of funds allocated.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2773 EB 1/15/2026 8:34:32 AM























Req. No. 2773 Page 22